Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2443
Supervised administration; interim orders; distribution and closing orders.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, supervised administration is terminated by order in accordance with time restrictions, notices and contents of orders prescribed for proceedings under section 30-24,115. Interim orders approving or directing partial distributions or granting other relief may be issued by the court at any time during the pendency of a supervised administration on the application of the personal representative or any interested person.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 121, UPC § 3-505.